Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,186.01
Rules and regulations.

The Environmental Quality Council may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to administer and enforce the provisions of the Remedial Action Plan Monitoring Act.

Laws 2004, LB 449, § 7.